Utah statutes.
53-3-905.   Dedication of fees.

(1) The following shall be deposited as dedicated credits in the Transportation Fund to be used by the division for the program:

(a)  $5 of the annual registration fee imposed for each registered motorcycle under Subsection 41-1a-1206(1)(a);

(b)  $4 of the six-month registration fee imposed for each registered motorcycle under Subsection 41-1a-1206(2)(a); and

(c)  $2.50 of the fee imposed under Section 53-3-105 for an original, renewal, or extension of a motorcycle endorsement.

(2)  Appropriations to the program are nonlapsing.

(3)  Appropriations may not be used for assistance to, advocacy of, or lobbying for any legislation unless the legislation would enhance or affect the financial status of the program or the program's continuation.



Amended by Chapter 397, 2012 General Session

